Utah statutes.
17B-1-801.   Establishment of local district merit system.

(1)  A merit system of personnel administration for the local districts of the state, their departments, offices, and agencies, except as otherwise specifically provided, is established.

(2)  This part does not apply to a local district with annual revenues less than $50,000.

